Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
SPECIFIC PROVISIONS COVERING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE

AND CHILD
WELFARE SERVICES

§§346-51 to 346-62 [OLD] REPEALED. L
1975, c 145, §1(3).

§346-51 Public assistance and child welfare
services administered by department. The department of human services
shall administer public assistance and child welfare services in the several
counties except for payments administered under the federal supplemental security
income program or its successor agency. No person shall be denied the right to
petition the department for additional assistance as established under section
346-53(f). [L 1975, c 145, pt of §1(3); am L 1980, c 120, §2; am L 1983, c 196,
§1; am L 1987, c 339, §4 and c 344, §1; am L 2008, c 16, §15]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next